District of Columbia statutes.
22-935

Exception.

A person shall not be considered to commit an offense of abuse or neglect under this chapter for the sole reason that he provides or permits to be provided treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone in accordance with a religious method of healing, in lieu of medical treatment, to the vulnerable adult to whom he has a duty of care with the express consent or in accordance with the practice of the vulnerable adult.

History

June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 205, 47 DCR 7039